Massachusetts, session 194th, H191.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (a1/2) of section 4 of chapter 94G of the General Laws is
hereby amended by striking clause (xxv) and inserting in place thereof the following:
(xxv) requirements for reasonable THC potency limits for each type of recreational
marijuana product sold by a licensee and reasonable potency or dosing limits for marijuana
concentrates and edible products, that shall, at a minimum, prohibit: (1) marijuana flower with
potency in excess of 30% THC ; (2) marijuana concentrates intended for inhalation following
vaporization or combustion that exceed 5mg THC per metered serving, or with potency
exceeding 30%; (3) concentrated forms of marijuana products which fail to clearly provide
metered, or otherwise measured, standard delivered servings of 5 mg THC; (4) packages of
marijuana concentrate that exceed 20 metered or measured servings of 5 mg; (5) a prohibition
on any marijuana product with added sweeteners; (6) any marijuana product with a
characterizing flavor for which the primary use is human inhalation of the gases, particles,
of 2

vapors or byproducts released as a result of the combustion, electrical ignition, or vaporization of
the flavored marijuana product; (7) any inhalable cannabinoid product containing non-cannabis-
derived substances, including flavors, non-cannabis terpenes, and/or chemicals that alter a legal
THC product’s consistency, texture, or viscosity; (8) any liquid marijuana products intended for
consumption by mouth, exceeding 5mg THC per container or per measured dose; (9)
components to strengthen the intoxicating effects of any marijuana product.
of 2